Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB542.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 48.165 is amended to read as follows:
In the submission of a branch budget recommendation to the General Assembly no
branch of government shall submit any item as a "necessary government expense" or
submit any item without a dollar amount affixed thereto, unless the entire proceeds of a
particular trust and agency or other designated fund or account are to be assigned to
specific budget units. In the event that all proceeds from a particular fund or account are
to be assigned to specific budget units, an estimate of the receipts of each budget unit for
each year of the fiscal biennium shall be provided together with the receipts from the
previous two (2) fiscal bienniums.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/9/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed